Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1721
County and township roads; portions within cities or villages; subject to municipal regulations.

Such portions of all public roads of the counties and townships as lie within the limits of any incorporated city or village shall conform to the direction and grade and be subject to all the regulations of other streets in such city or village.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. IV, § 21, p. 547.